Illinois, session 104th, HB2976.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 526-1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/26-1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 26-1)7    Sec. 26-1. Compulsory school age; exemptions. 8    (a) Whoever has custody or control of any child (i) 9between the ages of 7 and 17 years (unless the child has 10already graduated from high school) for school years before 11the 2014-2015 school year or (ii) between the ages of 6 (on or 12before September 1) and 17 years (unless the child has already 13graduated from high school) beginning with the 2014-2015 14school year shall cause such child to attend some public 15school in the district wherein the child resides the entire 16time it is in session during the regular school term, except as 17provided in Section 10-19.1, and during a required summer 18school program established under Section 10-22.33B; provided, 19that the following children shall not be required to attend 20the public schools:21        1. Any child attending a private or a parochial school 22    where children are taught the branches of education taught 23    to children of corresponding age and grade in the public   HB2976 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08841 LNS 18896 b1    schools, and where the instruction of the child in the 2    branches of education is in the English language;3        2. Any child who is physically or mentally unable to 4    attend school, such disability being certified to the 5    county or district truant officer by a competent physician 6    licensed in Illinois to practice medicine and surgery in 7    all its branches, a chiropractic physician licensed under 8    the Medical Practice Act of 1987, a licensed advanced 9    practice registered nurse, a licensed physician assistant, 10    or a Christian Science practitioner residing in this State 11    and listed in the Christian Science Journal; or who is 12    excused for temporary absence for cause by the principal 13    or teacher of the school which the child attends, with 14    absence for cause by illness being required to include the 15    mental or behavioral health of the child for up to 5 days 16    for which the child need not provide a medical note, in 17    which case the child shall be given the opportunity to 18    make up any school work missed during the mental or 19    behavioral health absence and, after the second mental 20    health day used, may be referred to the appropriate school 21    support personnel; the exemptions in this paragraph (2) do 22    not apply to any female who is pregnant or the mother of 23    one or more children, except where a female is unable to 24    attend school due to a complication arising from her 25    pregnancy and the existence of such complication is 26    certified to the county or district truant officer by a   HB2976 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08841 LNS 18896 b1    competent physician;2        3. Any child necessarily and lawfully employed 3    according to the provisions of the Child Labor Law of 2024 4    may be excused from attendance at school by the county 5    superintendent of schools or the superintendent of the 6    public school which the child should be attending, on 7    certification of the facts by and the recommendation of 8    the school board of the public school district in which 9    the child resides. In districts having part-time 10    continuation schools, children so excused shall attend 11    such schools at least 8 hours each week;12        4. Any child over 12 and under 14 years of age while in 13    attendance at confirmation classes;14        5. Any child absent from a public school on a 15    particular day or days or at a particular time of day for 16    the reason that he is unable to attend classes or to 17    participate in any examination, study, or work 18    requirements on a particular day or days or at a 19    particular time of day because of religious reasons, 20    including the observance of a religious holiday or 21    participation in religious instruction, or because the 22    tenets of his religion forbid secular activity on a 23    particular day or days or at a particular time of day. A 24    school board may require the parent or guardian of a child 25    who is to be excused from attending school because of 26    religious reasons to give notice, not exceeding 5 days, of   HB2976 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08841 LNS 18896 b1    the child's absence to the school principal or other 2    school personnel. Any child excused from attending school 3    under this paragraph 5 shall not be required to submit a 4    written excuse for such absence after returning to school. 5    A district superintendent shall develop and distribute to 6    schools appropriate procedures regarding a student's 7    absence for religious reasons, how schools are notified of 8    a student's impending absence for religious reasons, and 9    the requirements of Section 26-2b of this Code;10        6. Any child 16 years of age or older who (i) submits 11    to a school district evidence of necessary and lawful 12    employment pursuant to paragraph 3 of this Section and 13    (ii) is enrolled in a graduation incentives program 14    pursuant to Section 26-16 of this Code or an alternative 15    learning opportunities program established pursuant to 16    Article 13B of this Code;17        7. A child in any of grades 6 through 12 absent from a 18    public school on a particular day or days or at a 19    particular time of day for the purpose of sounding "Taps" 20    at a military honors funeral held in this State for a 21    deceased veteran. In order to be excused under this 22    paragraph 7, the student shall notify the school's 23    administration at least 2 days prior to the date of the 24    absence and shall provide the school's administration with 25    the date, time, and location of the military honors 26    funeral. The school's administration may waive this 2-day   HB2976 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08841 LNS 18896 b1    notification requirement if the student did not receive at 2    least 2 days advance notice, but the student shall notify 3    the school's administration as soon as possible of the 4    absence. A student whose absence is excused under this 5    paragraph 7 shall be counted as if the student attended 6    school for purposes of calculating the average daily 7    attendance of students in the school district. A student 8    whose absence is excused under this paragraph 7 must be 9    allowed a reasonable time to make up school work missed 10    during the absence. If the student satisfactorily 11    completes the school work, the day of absence shall be 12    counted as a day of compulsory attendance and he or she may 13    not be penalized for that absence; and14        8. Any child absent from a public school on a 15    particular day or days or at a particular time of day for 16    the reason that his or her parent or legal guardian is an 17    active duty member of the uniformed services and has been 18    called to duty for, is on leave from, or has immediately 19    returned from deployment to a combat zone or 20    combat-support postings. Such a student shall be granted 5 21    days of excused absences in any school year and, at the 22    discretion of the school board, additional excused 23    absences to visit the student's parent or legal guardian 24    relative to such leave or deployment of the parent or 25    legal guardian. In the case of excused absences pursuant 26    to this paragraph 8, the student and parent or legal   HB2976 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08841 LNS 18896 b1    guardian shall be responsible for obtaining assignments 2    from the student's teacher prior to any period of excused 3    absence and for ensuring that such assignments are 4    completed by the student prior to his or her return to 5    school from such period of excused absence. 6    (b) As used in this subsection (b), "civic event" means an 7event sponsored by a nonprofit organization or governmental 8entity that is open to the public. "Civic event" includes, but 9is not limited to, an inauguration or an artistic or cultural 10performance or educational gathering that supports the mission 11of the sponsoring nonprofit organization. The State Board of 12Education may adopt rules to further define "civic event". Any 13child from a public middle school or high school, subject to 14guidelines established by the State Board of Education, shall 15be permitted by a school board one school day-long excused 16absence per school year for the child who is absent from school 17to engage in a civic event. The school board may require that 18the student provide reasonable advance notice of the intended 19absence to the appropriate school administrator and require 20that the student provide documentation of participation in a 21civic event to the appropriate school administrator.22(Source: P.A. 102-266, eff. 1-1-22; 102-321, eff. 1-1-22; 23102-406, eff. 8-19-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-981, eff. 241-1-23; 103-721, eff. 1-1-25.)